dev/25072012-apertium-tur.tur.lexc
LEXICON SUBST

# ; 
clit-cop ; 
%<advl%>: # ; 
%<attr%>: clit-cop ;  ! This is the attributive adjective use of -kI, TRmorph <ki>
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} # ;  ! This is the attributive adjective use of -kI, TRmorph <ki>
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} NINFL-COMMON ; ! This is the attribute adjective 0 derived into a noun, TRmorph <ki>
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{k%}i DAKI ; ! This makes an attributive phrase from a noun, TRmorph <loc><ki>
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r clit ; 
NINFL-COMMON  ; 



LEXICON N1

%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: # ; 
%<adj%>:%>l%{I%}%{k%} # ; 
%<np%>%<top%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<np%>%<top%>%<loc%>:%'%>%{D%}%{A%}%{k%}i DAKI ; ! This makes an attributive phrase from a noun, TRmorph <loc><ki>

LEXICON NP-ACR

%<np%>%<acr%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<acr%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 


LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<al%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: # ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: # ; 

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: # ; 
%<n%>: # ; 
%<n%>:%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR
%<n%>: NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r NINFL-COMMON  ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' NINFL-COMMON  ;  ! Dir/LR

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: # ; 
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;  ! <adv> as <adj> function

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ;


LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: NINFL-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} # ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{bI%}nc%{I%} NINFL-COMMON ; ! This is <D_IncI> in TRmorph

LEXICON V-PERS-G1

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{k%} # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}z  # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  # ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}m clit ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n  clit ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z  clit ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r  clit ;


LEXICON V-PERS-COP-G2

%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>  clit ;
V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3 ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-OPT-G3

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>y%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>l%{I%}m # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-IMP-G4

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{A%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%> # ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n # ;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{A%}n%{I%}z%{A%} # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}nl%{A%}r # ;

LEXICON VINFL-COMMON

%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} # ;
%<ger1%>:%>m%{A%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} # ;
%<ger2%>:%>m%{A%}%{K%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger3%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş # ;
%<ger4%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}ş NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n # ;
%<ger5%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}n NINFL-COMMON ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<ger8%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} # ;
%<impp%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}r%{A%}%{k%} NINFL-COMMON ;

%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<prc1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p # ;
%<gna1%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%}p clit-cop ;

%<gna9%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} # ;
%<gna9%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} clit-cop ;

%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<cont%>:%>%{bI%}yor clit-cop ; ! This should be renamed e.g. <cont><past> 
%<opt%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} V-PERS-OPT-G3 ;
%<past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<evid%>:%>m%{I%}ş V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<imp%>: V-PERS-IMP-G4 ;
%<fut%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}c%{A%}%{k%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ; 
%<cond%>:%>s%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<pii%>:%>m%{A%}kt%{A%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<oblig%>:%>m%{A%}l%{I%} V-PERS-COP-G2 ;

!! Enumerate the possibilities for verb combinations in Turkish (go go turmorph!)
!! Unmarked entries get -t for causative if they end in l, r, or a vowel, otherwise -DIr. 
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_T-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>t  VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_IR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}r VINFL-COMMON ;


!LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_ART-AOR_AR
!%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
!%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{A%}rt VINFL-COMMON ;
!

LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR

%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ; ! add to all!
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;

!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<aor%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR
! art<iv><caus_ir><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}r VINFL-COMMON ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! gel<iv><caus_irreg>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{bI%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{bI%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;
!
LEXICON VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR
! IRREG does not get causative (it's in the lexicon ?)
! ay<iv><caus_irreg><aor_ar>
%<v%>%<iv%>: VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}bil VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<abil%>%<neg%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%}%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>:%>m%{A%} VINFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<neg%>%<aor%>:%>m%{A%}z V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%<v%>%<iv%>%<pih%>:%>%{A%}r%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;

LEXICON Nouns
armuz:armuz N1 ; ! ""
boksit:boksit N1 ; ! ""
çakırdiken:çakırdiken N1 ; ! ""
teseyyüp:teseyyü%{p%} N1 ; ! ""
epistemoloji:epistemoloji N1 ; ! ""
inzibat:inzibat N1 ; ! ""
kumru:kumru N1 ; ! ""
mahsul:mahs%{pU%}l N1 ; ! ""
piçuta:piçuta N1 ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns
Avrasya:Avrasya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Brezilya:Brezilya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Frankfurt:Frankfurt NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ispanya:Ispanya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Kerkük:Kerkük NP-TOP ; ! ""
Macaristan:Macaristan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Saraybosna:Saraybosna NP-TOP ; ! "Sarajevo"
Ankara:Ankara NP-TOP ; ! "Ankara"
Makfax:Makfax NP-AL ; ! "Makfax"
Rompres:Rompres NP-AL ; ! "Rompres"
Dnevnik:Dnevnik NP-AL ; ! ""
Beta:Beta NP-AL ; ! ""
SEtimes:SEtimes NP-AL ; ! ""
Sırp% Ordusu:Sırp% Ordusu NP-AL ; ! ""
Super% Galeb% G4:Super% Galeb% G4 NP-AL ; ! ""
Yüksek% Seçim% Kurulu:Yüksek% Seçim% Kurulu NP-AL ; ! ""
Alfred:Alfred NP-ANT-M ; ! "Alfred"
Bobby:Bobby NP-ANT-M ; ! "Bobby"
Dan:Dan NP-ANT-M ; ! "Dan"
Enrico:Enrico NP-ANT-M ; ! "Enrico"
Gil:Gil NP-ANT-M ; ! "Gil"
Jeffery:Jeffery NP-ANT-M ; ! "Jeffery"
Michele:Michele NP-ANT-M ; ! "Michele"
Salvatore:Salvatore NP-ANT-M ; ! "Salvatore"
Amy:Amy NP-ANT-F ; ! "Amy"
Carole:Carole NP-ANT-F ; ! "Carole"
Despina:Despina NP-ANT-F ; ! "Despina"
Gea:Gea NP-ANT-F ; ! "Gea"
Juliet:Juliet NP-ANT-F ; ! "Juliet"
Margaret:Margaret NP-ANT-F ; ! "Margaret"
Pandora:Pandora NP-ANT-F ; ! "Pandora"
Valencia:Valencia NP-ANT-F ; ! "Valencia"
Dink:Dink NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Kovaçeviç:Kovaçeviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Obradoviç:Obradoviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Stankoviç:Stankoviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Najdenovski:Najdenovski NP-COG-MF ; ! "Najdenovski"
Domenech:Domenech NP-COG-MF ; ! "Domenech"
Steinberg:Steinberg NP-COG-MF ; ! "Steinberg"
Zvenkovski:Zvenkovski NP-COG-MF ; ! "Zvenkovski"
LEXICON Acronyms
AP:AP%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "AP'nin"
BM:BM%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! BM'nin
DPMNE:DPMNE%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "DPMNE'nin"
FT:FT%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "FT'nin"
KFOR:KFOR%{un%} NP-ACR ; ! "KFOR'un"
PIC:PIC%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "PIC'nin"
SDS:SDS%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "SDS'nin"
TV:TV%{nin%} NP-ACR ; ! "TV'nin"
LEXICON Adjectives 
var:var A2 ; ! ""
yok:yok A2 ; ! ""
buçuk:buçu%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
az:az A1 ; ! ""
faşizan:faşizan A1 ; ! ""
lastik:lasti%{k%} A1 ; ! ""
pastoral:pastor%{pA%}l A1 ; ! ""
ünsüz:ünsüz A1 ; ! ""
caydırıcı:caydırıcı A1 ; ! "deterrent"
anlamlı:anlamlı A1 ; ! "meaningful"
haksız:haksız A1 ; ! "unjust"
Hırvat:Hırvat A3 ; ! "Croat"
Bulgar:Bulgar A3 ; ! "Bulgar"
İngiliz:İngiliz A3 ; ! "English"
Fransız:Fransız A3 ; ! "French"
Avusturyalı:Avusturyalı A3 ; ! ""
Libyalı:Libyalı A3 ; ! ""
Romanyalı:Romanyalı A3 ; ! ""
Amerikalı:Amerikalı A3 ; ! "American"
LEXICON Adverbs 
adilane:adilane ADV ; ! ""
balıklama:balıklama ADV ; ! ""
çalakaşık:çalakaşı%{k%} ADV ; ! ""
elhasıl:elhasıl ADV ; ! ""
gıyaben:gıyaben ADV ; ! ""
ikindiyin:ikindiyin ADV ; ! ""
neredeyse:neredeyse ADV ; ! ""
usulcacık:usulcacı%{k%} ADV ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
gel:gel VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_IR ; ! "come"
git:gi%{t%} VIVINFL-CAUS_AR-AOR_AR ; ! "go"
ay:ay VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
art:art VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
bat:bat VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
buy:buy VIVINFL-CAUS_IRREG-AOR_AR ; ! ""
doğ:doğ VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
taş:taş VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
uç:uç VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
yit:yit VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
şiş:şiş VIVINFL-CAUS_IR-AOR_AR ; ! ""
ağıllan:ağıllan VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
edin:edin VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
çözün:çözün VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! ""
kop:kop VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "shear off"
on:on VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "be happy"
sek:sek VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "rebound"
silahlan:silahlan VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "arm"
şükret:şükret VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "render thanks"
varol:varol VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR  ; ! "exist"
vazgeç:vazgeç VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR  ; ! "give up"
arık:arık VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "lose weight"
art:art VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "increase"
çıkış:çıkış VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "round on"
don:don VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "freeze"
görevlen:görevlen VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_IR ; ! "take a mission"
kan:kan VIVINFL-CAUS_DIR-AOR_AR ; ! "be cheated"
